Missouri, session 2026, HB2010.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein, for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 10.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item
or items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 2
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part 2
of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any clarification
of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be invalid, such
decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in this act of
which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of this act shall
consist of guidance to the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services in implementing the
appropriations found in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act. An
appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of a one-time
amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed to be a
component part of, and not in addition to, the stated appropriation
amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified as “one-
time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to any
ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 10.005. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ................................................................................................$652,333
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 18,762
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................671,095
Personal Service ..................................................................................................105,698
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 53,805
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 159,503
Total (Not to exceed 7.82 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$830,598
Section 10.006. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology Federal Fund
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$4,833,639
Section 10.020. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 3
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,518,909
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 305,736
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,824,645
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,317,826
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 794,441
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,112,267
To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department's hospitals and facilities
Personal Service ..................................................................................................648,233
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,490,054
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 4,138,287
Total (Not to exceed 126.55 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,075,199
Section 10.025. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For staff training, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed from
personal service to expense and equipment and three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$659,140
Personal Service ..................................................................................................231,677
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 290,481
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................522,158
For the Caring for Missourians' Mental Health Initiative
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 551,705
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,733,003
Section 10.030. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For Employee Support Resources

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 4
For support services to DMH state operated facilities and office staff
Personal Service ................................................................................................$396,636
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,269,650
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
5.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$1,666,286
Section 10.035. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For funding insurance, private pay, licensure fee, and/or Medicaid
refunds by state facilities operated by the Department of Mental
Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$205,000
For refunds
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................500,000
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ......................................................100
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147) .............................................100
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) .............................................................................100
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) .....................................................................................100
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ......................................................................50,000
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435) .................................................10,000
From Inmate Fund (1540) ......................................................................................................100
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) ............................................................................25,000
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ...............................................................150,000
For the transfer payment of refunds set off against debts as required by
Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 25,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$965,500
Section 10.040. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Mental
Health Trust Fund
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) .......................................................................$150,000
Section 10.045. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 5
For receipt and disbursement of donations and gifts which may become
available to the Department of Mental Health during the year
(excluding federal grants and funds)
Personal Service ................................................................................................$587,347
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 925,000
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) (Not to exceed 7.50 F.T.E.) ........................$1,512,347
Section 10.050. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of
any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended,
in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ................................................................................................$156,157
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,462,390
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
2.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$1,618,547
Section 10.055. To the Department of Mental Health
For Medicaid payments related to intergovernmental payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$11,900,000
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147) ........................... 6,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,500,000
Section 10.060. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
for providing the state match for the Department of Mental
Health payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$399,487,368
Section 10.065. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund to provide the state match for the
Department of Mental Health payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .....................................$322,779,896

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 6
Section 10.070. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for Disproportionate Share Hospital
funds leveraged by the Department of Mental Health - Institution
of Mental Disease facilities
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$42,803,679
Section 10.075. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For the Office of Disaster Services
For grant funding for the Crisis Counseling Program, Show Me Hope, to
provide services related to presidential disaster declarations
Personal Service (including $55,485 and 1.00 F.T.E. one-time) ......................$123,430
Expense and Equipment (including $1,312,374 one-time) ...................... 3,402,374
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
2.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$3,525,804
Section 10.100. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the administration of statewide comprehensive psychiatric services
and alcohol and drug abuse prevention and treatment programs,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,539,524
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 75,388
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,614,912
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,693,360
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,885,784
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................3,579,144
Personal Service ..................................................................................................389,142
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 270
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) ............................................................389,412
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 65,684
Total (Not to exceed 59.92 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,649,152

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 7
Section 10.105. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For prevention and education services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$13,729,737
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................82,148
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ....................................................................475,024
Personal Service
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) ..............................................................36,960
Personal Service ....................................................................................................85,730
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,372,959
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,458,689
Personal Service ..................................................................................................166,586
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 285,607
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................452,193
For enabling enforcement of the provisions of the Family Smoking
Prevention and Tobacco Control Act of 2009, in collaboration
with the Department of Public Safety, Division of Alcohol and
Tobacco Control
Personal Service ..................................................................................................342,077
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 201,159
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................543,236
For youth substance use prevention for a non-profit founded in 1958,
located in any city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, to reduce the
impact of alcohol, drugs, and addiction by providing quality
resources to individuals, families and the community
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) (one-time) ............................................30,000
For youth substance use prevention
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) (one-time) ..........................................270,000
For suicide prevention initiatives
Personal Service ....................................................................................................24,048

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 8
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 829,806
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 853,854
Total (Not to exceed 8.84 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$17,931,841
Section 10.106. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For statewide acquisition, distribution and monitoring of opioid
antagonists approved by the Food and Drug Administration, for
a public institution of higher education in any county with more
than one million inhabitants founded in 1963, provided $100,000
be utilized for a pilot project to distribute fentanyl test strips to
community-based organizations
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$5,100,000
For statewide acquisition, distribution and monitoring of opioid
antagonists approved by the Food and Drug Administration,
provided funds are for a public institution of higher education in
any county with more than one million inhabitants founded in
1963, to law enforcement agencies and first responders, and shall
be awarded through a competitive bidding process, and further
provided that the Department shall provide an annual report to
the House Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs
and Ranking Members regarding the use and distribution of such
opioid antagonists
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 5,000,000
Total ........................................................................................................................$10,100,000
Section 10.107. To the Department of Mental Health
For grants no less than $250,000 distributed to Prevention Resource
Centers for primary care substance-use prevention
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,000,000
Section 10.108. To the Department of Mental Health
For distribution to a fire department located in a city with more than one
hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five
thousand inhabitants that engages in partnerships between social

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 9
work resources, mental health resources, and emergency
responders to connect community members to essential services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 10.110. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Opioid Settlement Administration
For the reporting requirements pursuant to Section 196.1050, RSMo.
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$79,737
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (Not to
exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................$84,737
Section 10.115. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Community Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,670,740
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,200,000
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) ................................................. 4,681,787
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,552,527
Section 10.116. To the Department of Mental Health
For an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance Treatment and
Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, located in any city not within
a county, with at least twenty years of experience and currently
in the process of renovating clinics, to meet increasing substance
use needs in the community through clinic and recovery housing
renovations and expanded telehealth access
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$750,000
Section 10.117. To the Department of Mental Health
For a non-profit organization focused on veterans' healthcare
headquartered in any city not within a county, working in
collaboration with an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance
Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, for the
renovation of facilities to expand access to mental health and
employment training for veterans with opioid use disorder and
co-occurring substance use disorders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$250,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 10
Section 10.120. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Support Services
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,835,879
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) .........................................................3,000,000
For Recovery Support Services with the Access to Recovery Program
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,598,084
For peer-to-peer substance use disorder and mental health recovery
support services, located in any city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,533,963
Section 10.121. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Shelter Plus Care grants
Program Distribution
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$14,336,746
For housing assistance for homeless veterans, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................255,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,591,746
Section 10.122. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Housing Liaisons to provide assistance to Missourians with
disabilities in securing housing and receiving supportive services
and to serve as liaison between tenants, housing providers, and
the department
Program Distribution
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$2,500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 11
Section 10.123. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Community Behavioral Health Liaisons
Program Distribution
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) .......................................................$1,450,325
For Youth Behavioral Health Liaisons
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................177,275
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................564,769
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ..................................................................................................................500,000
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) ................................................. 132,956
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,825,325
Section 10.125. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Addiction Medicine Fellowships
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,000,000
Section 10.126. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a psychology internship program
Personal Service (one-time) ..............................................................................$218,192
Expense and Equipment (one-time) ......................................................... 10,500
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) (Not to exceed 5.60 F.T.E.)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$228,692
Section 10.127. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Substance Abuse Traffic Offender Program
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ...............................................................$4,495,353
Section 10.130. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For comprehensive psychiatric services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,574,946

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 12
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,605,748
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................18,180,694
Personal Service ..................................................................................................494,474
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,548,307
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................5,042,781
For adult psychiatric services, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and
10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
System, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................30,202,925
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................48,024,854
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ..................................................................................................................849,315
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ............................................1,310,572
From Missouri Crisis Services Fund (1344) ..............................................................18,500,000
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................2,426,903
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................625,021
Personal Service ..................................................................................................275,338
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 377,058
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................652,396
Personal Service ..................................................................................................279,257
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,213
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................300,470
Personal Service
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) ............................................................141,572

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 13
For Federally Qualified Health Centers, located in any city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, to provide mental health services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................200,000
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections
10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective
Payment System, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................8,662,074
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................82,141,611
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................2,174,002
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) .........................................................7,868,382
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................3,513,779
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................6,084,022
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ...............................................................963,775
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................6,040,316
For treatment of compulsive gambling
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) ......................................................................153,606
For youth psychiatric services, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and
10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
System, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,895,742
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................6,923,541
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ...............................................100,000
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................1,406,879

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 14
For the Division of Behavioral Health to implement the use of EEG
Guided Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation (e-TMS) equipment
for priority populations to include veterans, law enforcement and
first responders
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,117,297
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,117,298
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 2,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 50.52 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$262,619,827
Section 10.131. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For an organization serving a city not in a county and the surrounding
region to support prevention of opioid overdose
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,113,000
Section 10.135. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the MOConnect System
For the maintenance and operation of the crisis module
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$498,750
For the maintenance and operation of the referral module
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 498,750
Total ..............................................................................................................................$997,500
Section 10.140. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For reimbursing attorneys, physicians, and counties for fees in
involuntary civil commitment procedures, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,797,441
Section 10.142. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For outpatient competency restoration services authorized by Section
552.020, RSMo
Program Distribution

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 15
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,951,964
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 3,151,674
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,103,638
Section 10.143. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For jail based or other detention facility-based outpatient competency
restoration services authorized by Section 552.020, RSMo
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 10.145. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Forensic Mobile Teams to provide treatment to clients who are in
county jails awaiting court-ordered evaluations pursuant to
Chapter 552 RSMo and those who have been court-ordered for
competency restoration services in a Division of Behavioral
Health (DBH) inpatient facility pursuant to Chapter 552 RSMo
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,669,255
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 405,333
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,074,588
For a substance abuse initiative that focuses on providing medication
assisted treatment to treat substance use disorders. Eligible
Federally Qualified Health Centers shall have provided walk-in
medication assisted treatment services in the previous year
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 1,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 18.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,074,588
Section 10.150. To the Department of Mental Health
For engaging patients in care coordination (EPICC) 24/7 referral and
linkage service for those residing in targeted regions, primarily
for individuals post overdose, but who also may present to
hospitals with issues relating to opioid, stimulant, and/or alcohol
use disorders to establish immediate connections to recovery
support services, and substance use treatment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$500,000
Section 10.155. To the Department of Mental Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 16
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For prevention, treatment, and recovery programs at recovery high
schools
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$6,834,783
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 3,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,434,783
Section 10.160. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse for payment of services to
Certified Community Behavioral Health Organizations, provided
fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,943,592
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................26,241,033
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ..................................................................................................................316,129
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) .......................................................10,278,884
For adult psychiatric services and community programs, provided fifteen
percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................193,911,674
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................290,730,374
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................1,942,304
From Missouri Crisis Services Fund (1344) ..............................................................18,500,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................189,799
For youth psychiatric services and community programs, and further
provided that CPR/CCBHO services for youth shall not be

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 17
capped and Medicaid supplemental shall be requested when
necessary, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
between subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to
allow flexibility in payment for the Certified Community
Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment System, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................82,483,107
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................149,548,953
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 31,811,758
Total .......................................................................................................................$831,897,607
Section 10.161. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Roy Blunt Behavioral Health Scholarship Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 10.165. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a universal screening program used to identify maternal depression
and related behavioral health disorders including anxiety,
substance use disorder and depression
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ............................................$750,000
Section 10.170. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For 988 Crisis Response
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$3,140,197
From Missouri Crisis Services Fund (1344) ........................................................ 3,857,560
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,997,757
Section 10.175. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For administrative expenses related to the 988 Crisis Response
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$36,395
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................$41,395

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 18
Section 10.180. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
To pay the state operated hospital provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$12,010,000
For funding expenses related to fluctuating census demands, Medicare
bundling compliance, Medicare Part D implementation, and to
restore facilities personal service and/or expense and equipment
incurred for direct care worker training and other operational
maintenance expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................4,438,909
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 400,184
Total .........................................................................................................................$16,849,093
Section 10.250. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the State Operated Inpatient Psychiatric Hospitals and Treatment
Facilities: Fulton State Hospital, Northwest Missouri Psychiatric
Rehabilitation Center, Forensic Treatment Center, Southeast
Missouri Mental Health Center, Center for Behavioral Medicine,
Hawthorn Children’s Psychiatric Hospital, Southeast Missouri
Mental Health Center Sex Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment
Services, and Fulton State Hospital Sex Offender Rehabilitation
and Treatment Services, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Sections 10.130 and
10.160 for the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
services, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .........................................................................................$203,340,305
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 46,689,290
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................250,029,595
Personal Service .............................................................................................19,365,200
Expense and Equipment (including $10,500,000 one-time) .................... 12,369,144

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 19
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................31,734,344
Personal Service ..................................................................................................121,153
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,271,646
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) .................................................................1,392,799
Personal Service
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) ............................................................... 97,876
Total (Not to exceed 3,802.46 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$283,254,614
Section 10.400. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the division administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,883,186
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 52,145
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,935,331
Personal Service ..................................................................................................495,798
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 868,980
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,364,778
Total (Not to exceed 30.12 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,300,109
Section 10.405. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the payment of the state operated Intermediate Care Facilities for
Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities (ICF/IID) provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,902,000
Section 10.410. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
Provided residential services for non-Medicaid eligibles shall not
be reduced below the prior year expenditures as long as the
person is evaluated to need the services, and further provided
thirty percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between sections
10.410 and 10.415
For community programs, including long-term care transformation
initiatives and efforts for reimbursement of providers based on

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 20
integration of key identified outcomes that produce value-based
care delivery models to improve quality and efficiency of the
total care delivered to individuals,
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$963,444,597
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ....................................1,722,459,298
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................5,058,440
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................1,015,000
For community programs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,084,817
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 34,671
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,119,488
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,174,385
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 179,284
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,353,669
For services for children who are clients of the Department of Social
Services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ..........................................11,591,223
For youth services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ...............................................213,832
For Senate Bill 40 Board Tax Funds to be used as match for Medicaid
initiatives for clients of the division
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) .................................................... 5,889,538
Total (Not to exceed 27.59 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$2,712,145,085
Section 10.412. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Community Programs
For Value-Based Payments (VBP) to incentivize Medicaid providers to
improve outcomes for individuals in Home and Community-
Based Services (HCBS) DD Medicaid Waivers
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,963,700

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 21
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 9,036,300
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,000,000
Section 10.414. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For statewide autism outreach, education, and awareness programs for
persons with autism and their families
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,131,599
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................970,423
For an Autism Center located in a city with more than fifty-one thousand
but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................51,511
For Autism Outreach Initiatives for Children in Northeast Missouri
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................51,511
For Regional Autism Projects
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 9,017,135
Total .........................................................................................................................$23,222,179
Section 10.415. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Developmental Disabilities Health Home Program
For a designated provider (including a provider that operates in
coordination with a team of health care professionals) or a health
team selected by an eligible individual with chronic conditions to
provide health home services, designed to coordinate care for
individuals with identified health risks and chronic health
conditions receiving DD HCBS services, provided thirty percent
(30%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.410 and 10.415,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,060,110

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 22
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................12,178,717
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 1,121,820
Total .........................................................................................................................$20,360,647
Section 10.420. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the reimbursement of hospitals related to individuals who qualify for
placement and support through the Division of Developmental
Disabilities who may otherwise be eligible for discharge but
cannot be discharged due to a lack of availability within an
appropriate community placement. Such hospitals shall provide
a request for funding documenting these individuals, length of
stay beyond discharge, and effort to find placement. The division
shall on a pro-rata basis provide a per diem reimbursement on an
annual basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 10.425. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For community support staff
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,490,956
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 8,955,829
Total (Not to exceed 234.38 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,446,785
Section 10.430. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For developmental disabilities services, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$560,699
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,326,069
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to
exceed 7.98 F.T.E.) ........................................................................................$1,886,768
Section 10.435. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the
General Revenue Fund as a result of recovering the Intermediate

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 23
Care Facility Intellectually Disabled (ICF/IID) Reimbursement
Allowance Fund
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901) .................................................................................$2,447,105
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to Federal
Funds
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901) ........................................................................... 4,454,896
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,902,001
Section 10.500. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Central Missouri Regional Center, provided twenty-five (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,641,321
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 145,918
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,787,239
Personal Service ..................................................................................................723,014
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 111,063
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 834,077
Total (Not to exceed 98.70 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,621,316
Section 10.505. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Kansas City Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510,
10.515, and 10.520, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,409,346
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 209,056
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,618,402

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 24
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,369,119
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 111,945
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,481,064
Total (Not to exceed 97.74 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,099,466
Section 10.510. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Sikeston Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,423,346
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,668
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,530,014
Personal Service ..................................................................................................267,298
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,735
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 295,033
Total (Not to exceed 48.57 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,825,047
Section 10.515. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Springfield Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,918,871
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 137,069
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,055,940
Personal Service ..................................................................................................423,301
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,508
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 464,809
Total (Not to exceed 60.13 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,520,749

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 25
Section 10.520. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the St. Louis Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,710,914
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 328,620
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,039,534
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,190,148
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 246,273
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,436,421
Total (Not to exceed 141.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$8,475,955
Section 10.523. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the State-Owned and Operated Community Services and
Intermediate Care Facilities for Individuals with Intellectual
Disabilities (ICF/IID) Habilitation Centers: Bellefontaine,
Higginsville, St. Louis Developmental Disabilities Treatment
Center, Southeast Missouri Residential Services, Northwest
Community Services, Southwest Community Services, and
Southeast Missouri Residential Services, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.410
for the Purchase of Community Services, including transitioning
clients to the community or other state-operated services, and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$52,525,032
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,313,324
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................55,838,356
Personal Service .............................................................................................69,208,607
Expense and Equipment (including $4,500,000 one-time) ...................... 7,843,416
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................77,052,023

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 26
Expense and Equipment
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435) .................................... 3,417,038
Total (Not to exceed 2,395.13 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$136,307,417
Section 10.555. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To be distributed to programs promoting basic scientific research,
clinic patient research, and patient care for tuberous sclerosis
complex
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$450,000
Section 10.575. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 10.600. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Office of the Director
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$351,465
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,326
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................366,791
Personal Service ..................................................................................................625,522
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 67,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 692,570
Total (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,059,361
Section 10.605. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,015,828
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 384,070
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,399,898

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 27
For program operations and support
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,629,358
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,982,510
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,611,868
Personal Service ..................................................................................................353,200
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 199,900
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................553,100
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,226,238
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,027,134
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................3,253,372
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ......................................................330,000
Expense and Equipment
From Mammography Fund (1293) ...................................................................................25,000
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646) ...........................................................................................................44,571
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) ...........................................................30,000
Expense and Equipment
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780) .....................................................................25,000
Expense and Equipment
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ........................................................................30,000
Personal Service
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ............................................320
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .............................................1,020,524
Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) ........................................................ 50,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 28
Total (Not to exceed 100.85 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,373,653
Section 10.610. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the Health
Access Incentive Fund
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ............................................................................$916,477
Section 10.615. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For the payment of refunds set off against debts in accordance with
Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ..........................................................................$50,000
Section 10.620. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For refunds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
For refunds, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
federal and other funds
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................100,000
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ..........................................................9,240
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) .......................................................................5,000
From Mammography Fund (1293) .....................................................................................1,000
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................39,000
From Endowed Care Cemetery Audit Fund (1562) ............................................................2,899
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565) .........................................................................................2,500
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................................51,000
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................100,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646) ...........................................................................................................10,000
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) ...........................................................15,133
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) .........................................................................333
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) ..................................................................................13,495
From Brain Injury Fund (1742) .............................................................................................100
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ...............................................................................25
From Missouri State Coroners’ Fund (1846) ......................................................................1,200
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899) ........................................................ 275

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 29
Total ..............................................................................................................................$401,200
Section 10.625. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly, provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall
be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ................................................................................................$130,765
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,000,001
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,130,766
Personal Service ..................................................................................................120,264
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 347,596
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) .............................................. 467,860
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,598,626
Section 10.630. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 135.690, RSMo, to the General Revenue
Fund
From Medical Preceptor Fund (1260) ...........................................................................$200,000
Section 10.650. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For cancer and chronic disease control, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$240,922
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 75,872
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................316,794
Personal Service ..................................................................................................629,909
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,075,641

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 30
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................3,705,550
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,179
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 131,887
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ......................................................................285,066
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................26,241
For a grant program benefitting people living with amyotrophic lateral
sclerosis (ALS) and providing case services, including respite
care, care coordination, and clinical support
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For Community Based Navigation Services for breast cancer screening
and treatment provided by a statewide community based not-for-
profit with experience supporting low to moderate income
individuals who are either in need of preventative screening
services for breast cancer detection and/or treatment for breast
cancer
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the Show Me Healthy Women program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................473,898
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,894,453
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,368,351
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................20,000
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) .............................................. 32,548
Total (Not to exceed 21.06 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$8,004,550
Section 10.655. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 31
For communicable disease control and prevention, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650,
10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690,
10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730,
and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,220,501
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,658,458
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,878,959
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,575,665
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,012,961
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................4,588,626
Expense and Equipment
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................4,340,875
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 121,787
Total (Not to exceed 40.56 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$11,930,247
Section 10.660. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For community health and wellness initiatives, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided seventeen percent (17%) flexibility
between personal service and expense and equipment within the
Health Initiatives Fund (1275) within this section, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$495,661
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................515,661
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,030,405
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,821,136

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 32
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................7,851,541
Personal Service ....................................................................................................13,630
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,532,897
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................2,546,527
Personal Service ..................................................................................................168,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,506,500
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................2,675,355
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................216,300
For the Adolescent Health Program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................21,228
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,830,000
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................1,228
For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 800,000
Total (Not to exceed 24.16 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$16,457,840
Section 10.665. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For tobacco cessation services, provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility
is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665,
10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .......................$100,000
For tobacco addiction prevention
Expense and Equipment
From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631) ...................................... 300,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$400,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 33
Section 10.670. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Community and Public Health administration, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650,
10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690,
10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730,
and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,827,325
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,216,450
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,474,645
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,691,095
Personal Service ..................................................................................................100,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 140,000
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) .........................................................240,000
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,338,536
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................... 59,000
Total (Not to exceed 62.08 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,155,956
Section 10.675. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For emergency preparedness and response, provided $1,000,000 be used
to assist in maintaining the Poison Control Hotline, and further
provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between
sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680,
10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720,
10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$298,422
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,050,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,348,422

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 34
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,302,169
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,635,701
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................11,937,870
Personal Service ....................................................................................................98,589
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,472
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................123,061
Personal Service ....................................................................................................88,045
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 23,785
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..............................................111,830
Expense and Equipment
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .........................................................................500,000
For outbreak response
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................... 300,000
Total (Not to exceed 36.76 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$14,321,183
Section 10.680. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For environmental public health provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,197,674
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 206,075
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,403,749
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,399,047
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,101,278
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,500,325
Personal Service ..................................................................................................361,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 560,400
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................922,320
Personal Service ..................................................................................................467,430

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 35
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 73,984
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................541,414
Personal Service ..................................................................................................264,624
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 66,884
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................331,508
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Lead Abatement Loan Fund (1893) ..............................................................200
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 179,986
Total (Not to exceed 77.23 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$9,879,502
Section 10.685. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For genetics and newborn health services, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$358,671
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 696,320
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,054,991
Personal Service ..................................................................................................555,398
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 686,585
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,241,983
Personal Service ..................................................................................................173,323
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,700,062
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................1,873,385
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................10,585
For grants for newborn safety incubators in accordance with Section
210.950, RSMo
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 36
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For the SAFE-CARE Program, including implementing a regionalized
medical response to child abuse, providing daily review of cases
of children less than four (4) years of age under investigation by
the Missouri Department of Social Services, Children's Division,
and to provide medical forensics training to medical providers
and multi-disciplinary team members
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 14.64 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,680,944
Section 10.690. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For health informatics and epidemiology, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,329,570
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,551,228
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,399,209
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,950,437
Personal Service ....................................................................................................57,865
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,671
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ...........................63,536
Personal Service ....................................................................................................96,077
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 68,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646) .........................................................................................................164,125
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 33,577
Total (Not to exceed 55.53 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,541,245

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 37
Section 10.691. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For the maintenance and the annual subscription to the reportable disease
surveillance system
Program Distribution
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ....................................................$800,000
Section 10.695. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For human immunodeficiency virus, sexually transmitted infection, and
Hepatitis services, provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665,
10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$255,441
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 57,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................312,941
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,582,414
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,668,834
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................9,251,248
Personal Service ..................................................................................................166,780
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 319,977
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................486,757
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................10,309
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,615,117
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................65,171,601
For the Ryan White program, provided the eligible income requirement
is at or below three hundred percent (300%) of the Federal
Poverty Level (FPL)
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................700,782
Personal Service ..................................................................................................445,659

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 38
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,166
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 545,825
Total (Not to exceed 50.55 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$83,094,580
Section 10.700. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Local Public Health Agency support, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$291,815
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................320,315
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,472
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 82,140
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................147,612
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................14,573
For core public health functions and related expenses
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,372,392
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 8,400,000
Total (Not to exceed 3.41 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$18,254,892
Section 10.705. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For supplemental nutrition programs, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$7,960

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 39
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,628,871
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 167,001,410
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 171,630,281
Total (Not to exceed 68.45 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$171,638,241
Section 10.710. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For rural health and primary care initiatives, including the Health
Professional Loan Repayment Program (HPLRP), provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections
10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685,
10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725,
10.730, and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$302,998
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,302,998
Personal Service ..................................................................................................253,267
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,285,781
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,539,048
Personal Service ..................................................................................................126,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,450
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................141,370
Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) ...................................................................650,000
Expense and Equipment
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565) .....................................................................................158,900
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) ......................................................1,031,790
For the development of graduate medical education programs, including
but not limited to costs associated to creating and maintaining a
GME Technical Assistance Center, grants for creation of new

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 40
programs and expansion of existing programs in facilities that
take care of underserved and rural communities, and grants for
planning and other exploratory projects that position a facility to
sustain or increase graduate medical education opportunities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,501,120
For graduate medical program grants for specialty areas which provide
specific training for physicians to prevent, diagnose, and manage
substance use disorder/opioid use disorder, and for associated
costs to support technical assistance, new and expanded GME
programs, expansion of residency slots within an existing
program, and funding for planning or other exploratory projects
that position the state to increase graduate medical education
opportunities
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................5,000,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Board of Nursing Fund
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565) .......................................................................... 100,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.06 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$13,425,226
Section 10.715. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For oral health services and initiatives, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$99,214
Personal Service ..................................................................................................591,922
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 837,740
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,429,662
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................3,687

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 41
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658) .........................................................655,000
For the Elks Mobile Dental Clinic
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................350,000
For the Missouri Donated Dental Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 180,000
Total (Not to exceed 9.43 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$2,717,563
Section 10.720. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For minority health initiatives, provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility
is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665,
10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$230,997
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 181,121
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................412,118
Personal Service
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 39,128
Total (Not to exceed 3.98 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$451,246
Section 10.725. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For women's health and wellness programs and services, provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections
10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685,
10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725,
10.730, and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ................................................................................................$166,357
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,400

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 42
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................171,757
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,089,603
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,290,575
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................7,380,178
Personal Service ..................................................................................................112,088
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,563,582
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................4,675,670
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................4,916
Expense and Equipment
From Justice for Survivors Telehealth Network Fund (1228) ........................................100,000
For a statewide telehealth network for forensic examinations of victims
of sexual offenses
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,058,612
For contracts for Sexual Violence Victims Services, Awareness, and
Education Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund
(1143) ...............................................................................................................1,287,134
For the development and implementation of initiatives to reduce
maternal mortality, including maternal quality control protocols,
a perinatal health access collaborative, maternal care provider
trainings, postpartum plans of care best practices, and a state
maternal and child health dashboard
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,175,000
Total (Not to exceed 20.51 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$17,853,267
Section 10.730. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 43
For fetal infant mortality review services, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$960,000
For a non-governmental, previously established local FIMR team in a
city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county will be allowed to operate
independently of the state program with a separate IRB to review
select zip codes in a city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, but will utilize
standards and methods of review established by the Department,
coordinate with the state FIMR Program and regional FIMR
teams, and submit all outcomes, findings and data for their areas
of purview to the state program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 40,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 10.735. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For vital records certification and issuance, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,387,744
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 56,720
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,444,464
Personal Service ..................................................................................................162,709
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 787,754
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................950,463
Personal Service ..................................................................................................130,693

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 44
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,724
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................156,417
Personal Service ..................................................................................................110,956
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,748
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780) ...................................................................138,704
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................11,371
For the finalization of updates to the Department of Health and Senior
Services Vital Records System, including necessary
infrastructure, security enhancements, and staff training
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................1,763,000
For coroner trainings provided by the Missouri Coroners' and Medical
Examiners' Association
From Missouri State Coroners’ Fund (1846) ....................................................... 355,482
Total (Not to exceed 28.94 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,819,901
Section 10.740. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
To address coronavirus preparedness and response, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) ..............................................................................................$360,783
To provide coronavirus mitigation efforts, including, but not
limited to, testing, tracing, reporting, and related expenses,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,000,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,309,435
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
(2350) .............................................................................................................51,309,435

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 45
For Epidemiology Laboratory Capacity – Advanced Molecular
Detection – Public Health Lab Preparedness, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) .............................................................................................4,634,965
For Strengthening Healthcare Associated Infections and Antibiotic
Resistance Program Capacity, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
grant programs in this section
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,010,359
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,685,803
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) .............................................................................................3,696,162
To provide COVID-19 mitigation and prevention efforts,
including, but not limited to, testing, vaccinations, reporting, and
public health workforce enhancement, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act
of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,816,452
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 35,433,359
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) ...........................................................................................37,249,811
For the Disease Intervention Specialist Program to prevent the spread of
COVID-19 and other infectious diseases among vulnerable
communities, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in
this section
Personal Service ..................................................................................................156,673
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,697,407
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) ..................................................................................... 2,854,080
Total (Not to exceed 26.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$100,105,236
Section 10.750. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the State Public Health Laboratory,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 46
including providing newborn screening services on weekends
and holidays, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,577,649
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,137,683
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,715,332
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,262,010
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,298,268
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................3,560,278
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,077,479
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,494,336
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................8,571,815
Personal Service ..................................................................................................521,744
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,968,131
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................2,489,875
Personal Service ..................................................................................................158,666
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 562,586
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................721,252
Personal Service ....................................................................................................56,057
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 239,452
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................295,509
Expense and Equipment
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899) ........................................................ 65,017
Total (Not to exceed 109.78 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,419,078
Section 10.800. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$15,379,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,333,490
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................16,712,764
Personal Service .............................................................................................16,431,266

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 47
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,621,325
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................18,052,591
For Medicaid Home and Community-Based Services Program
reassessments, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ..................................................................................................943,724
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 866,186
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,809,910
Personal Service ..................................................................................................943,723
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 866,186
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,809,909
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 31,150
Total (Not to exceed 624.19 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$38,416,324
Section 10.805. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For non-Medicaid reimbursable senior and disability programs, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$555,005
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,924,500
For special health care needs programs, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,834,778
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,145,238
From Brain Injury Fund (1742) ......................................................................................974,900
From C & M Smith Memorial Endowment Trust Fund (1873) ........................................10,000
From Children’s Special Health Care Needs Service Fund (1950) ..................... 5,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,449,421
Section 10.810. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 48
For providing consumer directed personal care assistance services at a
rate not to exceed sixty percent (60%) of the average monthly
Medicaid cost of nursing facility care, including payments to
providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Section 10.815 to allow flexibility within the Medicaid Home and
Community-Based Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$256,841,615
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 466,816,847
Total .......................................................................................................................$723,658,462
Section 10.815. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For respite care, homemaker chore, personal care, assistive technology,
adult day care, AIDS, children's waiver services, home-delivered
meals, Programs of All Inclusive Care for the Elderly, the
Structured Family Caregiver Waiver, Brain Injury Waiver, other
related services, and program management under the Medicaid
fee-for-service and managed care programs, including payments
to providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided that
individuals eligible for or receiving nursing home care must be
given the opportunity to have those Medicaid dollars follow them
to the community to the extent necessary to meet their unmet
needs as determined by 19 CSR 30 81.030 and further be allowed
to choose the personal care program option, including the option
of assistive technology, in the community that best meets the
individuals' unmet needs, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between this section and Section 10.810 to allow
flexibility within the Medicaid Home and Community Based
Services Program, and further provided that individuals eligible
for the Medicaid Personal Care Option must be allowed to
choose, from among all the program options, that option which
best meets their unmet needs as determined by 19 CSR 30
81.030; and also be allowed to have their Medicaid funds follow
them to the extent necessary to meet their unmet needs whichever
option they choose. This language does not create any
entitlements not established by statute
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 49
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$241,403,940
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 441,206,018
Total .......................................................................................................................$682,609,958
Section 10.816. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For the purposes of funding a family complex care assistant program
under which a parent, guardian, family member, and any other
individual with a close association that is the equivalent of a
family relationship of an enrollee in Medicaid approved by the
enrollee's parent or guardian may be employed by a private duty
nursing agency as a Complex Care Assistant (CCA) and, under
the direction of a Registered Nurse, to provide CCA services to
the enrollee
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,800,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 7,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,000,000
Section 10.820. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Senior
Services Growth and Development Program Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,494,746
Section 10.825. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For Home and Community Services grants to be distributed to the Area
Agencies on Aging, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed from these services to meal services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,074,704
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................37,244,641
For distributions to the Area Agencies on Aging, in accordance with
Section 192.385, RSMo, which requires the deposit of a portion
of the premium tax collected under Sections 148.320 and
148.370, RSMo, to the Senior Services Growth and Development
Program Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 50
From Senior Services Growth and Development Program Fund (1419) ...................19,530,621
For meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging, provided that
at least $500,000 of general revenue be used for non-Medicaid
meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging in
proportion to the actual number of meals served during the
preceding fiscal year, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between these services and grant services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................14,898,003
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................21,618,454
From Elderly Home-Delivered Meals Trust Fund (1296) ................................................62,958
For the Ombudsman Program operated by the Area Agencies on Aging
or their service providers
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 150,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$95,579,381
Section 10.830. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For Alzheimer’s program grants to be used by organizations serving
individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and their caregivers as well
as providing statewide respite assistance and support programs to
Missouri families to ease burden, enhance quality of life, and
reduce the number of persons with Alzheimer’s disease who are
prematurely or unnecessarily institutionalized, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$550,000
For caregiver training programs which include in-home visits that delay
the institutionalization of persons with dementia
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 650,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 10.835. To the Department of Health and Senior Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 51
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For senior independent living programs that support seniors aging in
place in communities with a high concentration of older adults,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 10.840. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing naturalization assistance to refugees and/or legal
immigrants who: have resided in Missouri more than five years,
are unable to benefit or attend classroom instruction, and who
require special assistance to successfully attain the requirements
to become a citizen. Services may include direct tutoring,
assistance with identifying and completing appropriate waiver
requests to the Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency,
and facilitating proper documentation. The department shall
award a contract under this section to a qualified not-for-profit
organization which can demonstrate its ability to work with this
population. A report shall be compiled for the General Assembly
evaluating the program’s effectiveness in helping senior refugees
and immigrants in establishing citizenship and their ability to
qualify individuals for Medicare
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 10.900. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$13,646,271
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,167,707
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................14,813,978
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,989,032
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,423,811
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................15,412,843
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,422,531
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 286,589

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 52
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ...................................................1,709,120
Personal Service ....................................................................................................87,497
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,121
From Mammography Fund (1293) .................................................................................100,618
For nursing home quality initiatives
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ...................................725,000
For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs operations and
support
Personal Service ....................................................................................................15,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,115
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................20,035
Personal Service ..................................................................................................100,580
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,192
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) ...................................................................111,772
Personal Service
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................303,472
For activities and equipment that further promote Cardiac Emergency
Plan preparedness, but not limited to the purchase of AEDs and
AED maintenance, the purchase of CPR training kits or CPR
training of faculty and staff, basic first aid training and
educational materials
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ......................................................................2,000,000
For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs for a Physician
Prescription Monitoring Program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................170,488
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 69,116
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................239,604
Personal Service
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................120,128

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 53
For expending Civil Monetary Penalty funding on federally approved
nursing facility activities and projects
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ...................................................4,000,000
For the Time Critical Diagnosis Unit
Personal Service ..................................................................................................464,203
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 356,857
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 821,060
Total (Not to exceed 390.78 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$40,377,630
Section 10.901. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For the Nursing Home Staffing Campaign (NHSC) in partnership with
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid (CMS) to increase the
number of nurses working in nursing homes
Program Distribution
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) (one-time) ...............................$2,649,459
Section 10.902. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For the design, plan, testing, and implementation of a new database
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)
(one-time) .......................................................................................................$1,700,000
Section 10.905. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For the Quality Improvement Program for Missouri (QIPMO) to provide
technical assistance to nursing homes, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ..............................$1,209,926
Section 10.910. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Cannabis Regulation
For medical marijuana program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,881,115

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 54
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,167,458
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .............................................5,048,573
For adult use cannabis program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................9,171,823
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,568,740
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .......................14,740,563
For grants to agencies and not-for-profit organizations, whether
government or community-based, to increase access to evidence
based low-barrier drug addiction treatment, prioritizing
medically proven treatment and overdose prevention and reversal
methods and public or private treatment options with an emphasis
on reintegrating recipients into their local communities; to
support overdose prevention education; and to support job
placement, housing, and counseling for those with substance use
disorders. When evaluating grant applications, agencies and
organizations serving populations with the highest rates of drug
related overdose shall be prioritized to receive the grants
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ............................................................. 3,870,000
Total (Not to exceed 155.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$23,659,136
Section 10.915. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for substance
abuse disorder treatment and education programs as provided by
Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Mental
Health Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall
invest monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Mental Health
Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the Mental Health Reinvestment Fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the General Revenue
Fund
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) (including $300,000 one-time) ...............$28,508,596

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 55
Section 10.920. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Department of Corrections
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for substance
abuse disorder treatment and education programs as provided by
Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the
Corrections Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall
invest monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Corrections Reinvestment
Fund, and further provided that any monies remaining in the
Corrections Reinvestment Fund at the end of the biennium shall
not revert to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ...................................................................$1,803,929
Section 10.925. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 1 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Missouri
Veterans' Homes Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .........................................$13,000,000
Section 10.930. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for substance
abuse disorder treatment and education programs as provided by
Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Health
Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall invest
monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Health Reinvestment Fund,
and further provided that any monies remaining in the Health
Reinvestment Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)
(including $20,018,276 one-time) ................................................................$40,018,276

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 56
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for public
defenders as provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to the Public Defender Reinvestment Fund,
provided the state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the
same manner as other funds are invested, and any interest and
monies earned on such investments shall be deposited to the
credit of the Public Defender Reinvestment Fund, and further
provided that any monies remaining in the Public Defender
Reinvestment Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)
(including $31,700,260 one-time) ..................................................................51,700,260
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Missouri
Veterans’ Homes Fund, provided the state treasurer shall invest
monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Missouri Veterans’ Homes
Fund, and further provided that any monies remaining in the
Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund at the end of the biennium shall
not revert to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)
(including $20,018,276 one-time) ............................................................ 40,018,276
Total .......................................................................................................................$131,736,812
Section 10.950. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 10.2005. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.105, 10.115, 10.130, 10.142, 10.143,
and 10.160 of Part 1 of this act:

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 57
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2026, with the
exception of providers of children’s residential services classified
as an Institution of Mental Disease (IMD) Qualified Residential
Treatment Program (QRTP) or as a non-IMD QRTP, for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than:
$194.47 per day for Level II, $239.16 per day for Level III,
$253.80 per day for Level IV; and further excepting provider
rates for outpatient competency restoration services, for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than those
based on actuarially sound PPS rates, and further excepting the
jail based and other detention facility based outpatient
competency restoration rates, for which no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of greater than $90 per bed day.
Section 10.2010. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.115 and 10.120 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, with the
exception of Recovery Support Services, for which no funds shall
be expended in furtherance of rates greater than: $34.46 for
Individual Counseling, $44.57 for Recovery Housing, $12.60 for
Care Coordination, $22.15 for Peer Support, and $4.08 for Group
Rehabilitative Support.
Section 10.2015. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 10.410 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of waiver slots
assigned on July 1, 2026 except for: 50 additional waiver slots
for Crisis Residential Services, 27 additional slots for individuals
transitioning from Nursing Homes, 39 additional slots for
children transitioning from DSS Children's Division funded
waiver slots, and 11 additional waiver slots for children
transitioning out of the MoCDD Waiver.
Section 10.2020. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 10.410 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2026, and further

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 58
excepting rates for day habilitation services, for which no funds
shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than: $10.81 per
15 minute unit/$43.24 per hour for day habitation, $12.30 per 15
minute unit/$49.20 per hour for day habilitation behavior, and
$12.14 per 15 minute unit/$48.56 per hour for day habilitation
medical; and further excepting rates for self-directed services, for
which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater
than: $8.25 per 15 minute unit/$33.00 per hour for personal
assistant, $9.19 per 15 minute unit/$36.76 per hour for personal
assistant-medical exception, and $8.25 per 15 minute unit/$33.00
per hour for personal assistant scheduled team conference.
Section 10.2025. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 10.415 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of a DD Health Home
rate of $105.90 PMPM.
Section 10.2030. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Sections 10.805, 10.810, 10.815, and 10.825 of
Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, except Private
Duty Nursing rates for which no funds shall be expended in
furtherance of provider rates for Private Duty Nursing greater
than a rate of $15.20 per fifteen-minute unit of service, and
further excepting provider reassessment services rates, for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than
$100 per assessment, unless such provider is enrolled in the
Value Based Purchasing Reassessment Program, and further
excepting the Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals rates for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates for
Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals not greater than the lesser of
actual costs or $10.99 per meal.
Section 10.2040. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Section 10.815 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Independent Living
Waiver personal care hours beyond the 60% cost cap Medicaid

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 59
State Plan personal care hours of more than 49 hours per week,
or 7 hours per day, per waiver participant.
Section 10.2045. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Section 10.815 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Aged and Disabled
Waiver Respite Care hours of more than 49 hours per week, or 7
hours per day, per waiver participant.
PART 3
Section 10.3005. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.005 through and including 10.575 in
of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly reports to the House
Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs and
Ranking Members for each DMH Medicaid waiver, large service
type by waiver, value-based payments, and targeted case
management costs: 1) The actual federal and state share
expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of waiver slots
assigned, average cost per slot, estimated current fiscal year
costs, estimated full fiscal year costs; 2) The actual federal and
state share expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of
new waiver slots assigned in FY 2027, average cost per slot,
estimated current fiscal year costs, estimated full fiscal year
costs; and 3) The number of individuals presenting for service
that have not been assigned a waiver slot, estimated current fiscal
year federal and state share costs if they were to be assigned,
estimated full fiscal year costs if they were to be assigned.
Section 10.3010. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.005 through and including 10.575 in
of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly reports to the House
Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs and
Ranking Members the actual overtime paid by month in the
current fiscal year, the estimate of overtime to be paid in the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 60
current fiscal year by month, the cumulative number of accrued
overtime hours for department employees, and the dollar
equivalent of such overtime hours.
Section 10.3012. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Section 10.825 of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall provide cumulative quarterly reports to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs no
more than 45 days upon the end of each quarter for each service
category and the related administrative costs provided by each
Area Agency on Aging: 1) the actual federal and state share
expenditures by quarter to date by appropriation and fund,
projected full state fiscal year costs; 2) the actual total units
delivered by quarter to date, projected units to be delivered for
the full state fiscal year; 3) the number of individuals presenting
for service that have not been served by quarter to date, including
the projected costs to serve them annually.
Section 10.3015. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Departments shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
Section 10.3020. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act:
The Departments shall provide written documentation of rate
setting reports, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and
random moment time studies; and the federal and state share
fiscal impact estimates, to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
Section 10.3025. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2010 61
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports,
maintenance of effort reports, and public assistance cost
allocation plans submitted to the federal government and
supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the House Budget
and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking
Members.
Section 10.3030. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification of spend plans
and spend plan amendments to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members prior to
submission to the federal government and prior to expenditure of
such funds.
Section 10.3032. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification of Home and
Community-Based Services spend plans and spend plan
amendments to the House Budget and Senate Appropriations
Committee Chairs and Ranking Members prior to submission to
the federal government and prior to expenditure of such funds.
Department of Mental Health Totals
General Revenue Fund (4,952.32 F.T.E.) ...........................................................$1,745,888,421
Federal Funds (2,259.63 F.T.E.) ...........................................................................2,605,171,337
Other Funds (27.10 F.T.E.) ................................................................................. 142,522,502
Total (7,239.05 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$4,493,582,260
Department of Health and Senior Services Totals
General Revenue Fund (649.93 F.T.E.) .................................................................$614,023,653
Federal Funds (979.33 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................1,449,396,448
Other Funds (314.19 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 84,336,059
Total (1,943.45 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$2,147,756,160
